New York, session 2025-2026, S6785.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraphs (n) and (o) of subdivision 3 of section 265.01-e 2 of the penal law, paragraph (n) as amended and paragraph (o) as added by 3 section 1 of part F of chapter 55 of the laws of 2023, are amended and a 4 new paragraph (p) is added to read as follows: 5 (n) persons while participating in military ceremonies, funerals, and 6 honor guards; [or] 7 (o) persons while lawfully engaging in learning, practicing, training 8 for, competing in, or travelling into or within the state to learn, 9 practice, train for, or compete in, the sport of biathlon, in accordance 10 with all applicable local, state, and federal laws, rules, and regu- 11 lations[.]; or 12 (p) a judge, justice, or criminal prosecutor who is duly licensed to 13 carry concealed firearms in their possession, acting in the scope of 14 their official duties, at a court facility, where such court facility is 15 not secured by one or more magnetometers, and no duly designated and 16 assigned security personnel is present. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02752-01-5